chimborazo/bugs/test.aff
SET UTF-8

COMPOUNDFLAG /       # allow compound for this word
COMPOUNDEND >        # words that end compounds
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG + # allow (stem+affix)+compound
ONLYINCOMPOUND x     # For words only allowed in compounds
COMPOUNDMORESUFFIXES # Allow 2-fold suffix PLUS compound

# first level
SFX v Y 1
SFX v 0 explained//+c . # Level1

# second level
SFX c Y 2
SFX c 0 ness//+ . # Level2
SFX c 0 nessy/x . # Level2 only allowed in compounds
